Utah statutes.
48-2a-705.   Power of estate of deceased or incompetent partner.
If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction
adjudges him to be incompetent to manage his person or his property, the
partner's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal
representative may exercise all of the partner's rights for the purpose of
settling his estate or administering his property, including any  authority
the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner.  If
a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or
terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal
representative or successor.
